Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1501.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 29RADIATION TESTING PILOT PROGRAMSec.2901. Definitions.2902. Operation of Radiation Testing Pilot Program.2903. Powers and duties of department.2904. Report to General Assembly.2905. Subsequent actions regarding radiation testing.§ 2901. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 1234567891011121314151617 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Dosimeter." A device used to measure an individual's exposure to radiation."Operator." A well operator."Owner." As defined in section 3203 (relating to definitions)."Pilot program." The Radiation Testing Pilot Program established under section 2902(a) (relating to operation of Radiation Testing Pilot Program)."Well." As defined in section 3203.§ 2902. Operation of Radiation Testing Pilot Program.(a) Establishment.--The Radiation Testing Pilot Program is established within the department to:(1) Improve the detection of potentially radioactive leachate at well sites.(2) Protect individuals who work at oil or gas drilling sites.(b) Commencement and duration.--The pilot program shall operate for one full year, beginning January 1 of the year that begins at least six months after the effective date of this subsection.§ 2903. Powers and duties of department.(a) Guidelines and procedures.--The department shall establish guidelines and procedures necessary for the implementation and administration of the pilot program, which must also include:(1) The requirement that each individual working at an oil or gas drilling site shall wear a dosimeter to measure 20250HB1501PN1756 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and monitor radiation levels.(2) The requirement that each owner or operator of an oil or gas drilling site shall report to the department, on a quarterly basis in the form and manner as determined by the department, the average radiation level to which individuals working at the oil or gas drilling site of the owner or operator are exposed, as detected by a dosimeter worn by the individuals.(b) Selection.--The department shall select at least three oil or gas drilling sites located in this Commonwealth to participate in the pilot program.§ 2904. Report to General Assembly.(a) Issuance.--No later than one year after the commencement of the pilot program, the department shall issue a report to the General Assembly on radiation levels measured at oil and gas drilling sites, which must also include any recommendations to:(1) Improve radiation safety.(2) Expand the pilot program or develop a radiation testing program on a permanent Statewide basis based on the pilot program.(b) Submittal.--The department shall submit the report under subsection (a) to:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Energy Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental and Natural Resource Protection Committee of the House of Representatives.§ 2905. Subsequent actions regarding radiation testing.20250HB1501PN1756 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 After submitting the report in accordance with section 2904(b) (relating to report to General Assembly), the department may take actions to expand the pilot program or develop a radiation testing program on a permanent Statewide basis based on the pilot program, unless otherwise directed by the General Assembly.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1501PN1756 - 4 - 1234567